Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 6. Postsecondary Career Technical Education

§ 1591.
Governance.

The governing body for the provision of postsecondary career technical education shall be the Board of Trustees of the Vermont State Colleges pursuant to chapter 72 of this title. However, nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to diminish or interfere with the rights and responsibilities of students in postsecondary degree-granting programs or the public or private institutions offering such programs.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1592.
Powers and responsibilities of Board of Trustees.

With respect to the provision of postsecondary career technical education programs, in addition to those powers and responsibilities set forth in chapter 72 of this title, the Vermont State Colleges Board of Trustees shall:

provide on a statewide basis, subject to the payment of fees by enrolled students, postsecondary career technical education programs and establish policies and determine curriculum for the provision of such education;

coordinate such programs with secondary regional career technical education centers and, to the maximum extent possible, contract with such centers for the use of the center’s facilities;

coordinate such programs with other employment and training programs such as those offered by the Department of Employment and Training, the Department of Labor, the Department for Children and Families, the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, independent colleges, and the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation; and

possess all other necessary and implied powers to carry out such responsibilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 34.

§ 1593.
Secondary students in postsecondary career technical education programs.

A secondary career technical student may be enrolled in postsecondary career technical education courses at the expense of the student’s school district of residence if the enrollment is accepted by the postsecondary career institution and approved by the district of residence as being in the best interests of the student and if the enrollment is approved for credit toward high school graduation requirements. The school board awarding graduation credits shall consider the recommendation of the regional advisory board, regional technical center school district board, or any other authorized alternate governing board and shall provide an opportunity for the secondary student also to receive postsecondary credit.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2005, No. 54

, § 13.